Alaska statutes. Title 28. Motor Vehicles.
Article 2. Duties Following Accidents.

Sec. 28.35.050.
Action of operator immediately after accident.

An operator of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of a person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible and return to, and remain at, the scene until the operator has fulfilled the requirements of AS

28.35.060

.

The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle driven or attended by a person shall immediately stop the vehicle at the scene of the accident or as close to it as possible and return to, and remain at, the scene of the accident until the operator has fulfilled the requirements of AS

28.35.060

.

The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting only in damage to a vehicle that is unattended shall immediately stop at the scene of the accident and undertake reasonable means and efforts to locate and notify the operator or owner of the damaged unattended vehicle of the name and address of the operator and owner of the vehicle striking the unattended vehicle. If the operator or owner of the unattended vehicle cannot be located then the operator shall leave in a conspicuous place in or upon the unattended vehicle, a writing stating the name and address of the operator and of the owner of the vehicle that struck the unattended vehicle and setting forth a statement of the circumstances of the accident.

History.

(§ 50-5-5 a, b ACLA 1949; am § 1 ch 69 SLA 1960)

Sec. 28.35.060.
Duty of operator to give information and render assistance.

The operator of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in injury to or death of a person or damage to a vehicle that is driven or attended by a person shall give the operator’s name, address, and vehicle license number to the person struck or injured, or the operator or occupant, or the person attending, and the vehicle collided with and shall render to any person injured reasonable assistance, including making of arrangements for attendance upon the person by a physician and transportation, in a manner that will not cause further injury, to a hospital for medical treatment if it is apparent that treatment is desirable. Under no circumstances is the giving of assistance or other compliance with the provisions of this paragraph evidence of the liability of an operator for the accident.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a person who fails to comply with any of the requirements of this section is, upon conviction, punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $500, or by both. This provision does not apply to a person incapacitated by the accident to the extent that the person is physically incapable of complying with the requirement.

A person who fails to comply with a requirement of this section regarding assisting an injured person is, upon conviction, punishable by imprisonment for not more than 10 years, or by a fine of not more than $10,000, or by both. This provision does not apply to a person incapacitated by the accident to the extent that the person is physically incapable of complying with the requirement.

History.

(§ 50-5-5 c, d ACLA 1949; am §§ 1, 2 ch 85 SLA 1968)

Sec. 28.35.070.
Examination or impounding before repair.

A person may not make or have made repairs to damage or injury to a motor vehicle that could have been caused by collision with a person or property without first notifying the Department of Public Safety, chief of police, or in the absence of these, the nearest police officer or other peace officer, who shall immediately examine the vehicle and make a full report subscribed by the person in whose custody the vehicle then is.
A copy of the report shall be mailed or delivered to the Department of Public Safety.
If no official is within 10 miles of the place where the vehicle is brought for repair, then no notice or examination is required.
If there is ground for suspecting that the vehicle was involved in a collision with a person, the vehicle shall be impounded at the expense of the owner, for which the custodian shall have a lien, and shall be accessible only to officers detailed to the investigation of the case until released.
If, however, there is no reason to suspect that the damage to the motor vehicle was caused by collision with a person or property, the repair of the vehicle may be authorized by the officer in charge of the investigation at any time after the expiration of 24 hours thereafter.

History.

(§ 50-5-5 f ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 123 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “police officer” was substituted for “policeman” in this section under § 59, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Sec. 28.35.080.
Immediate notice of accident.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in bodily injury to or death of a person or total property damage to an apparent extent of $2,000 or more shall immediately by the quickest means of communication give notice of the accident to the local police department if the accident occurs within a municipality, otherwise to the Department of Public Safety.

The driver of a vehicle involved in an accident resulting in bodily injury to or death of a person or total property damage to an apparent extent of $2,000 or more shall, within 10 days after the accident, forward a written or electronic report of the accident to the Department of Administration and to the local police department if the accident occurs within a municipality. A report is not required under this subsection if the accident is investigated by a peace officer.

The form of accident report required under (b) of this section can be obtained from the department’s Internet website, any local police department, or the Department of Public Safety.

The Department of Administration may require the driver of a vehicle involved in an accident of which a report must be made to file supplemental reports whenever the original report is insufficient in the opinion of that department.

Every law enforcement officer who, in the regular course of duty, investigates a motor vehicle accident for which a report must be made, either at the time of and at the scene of the accident or thereafter by interviewing the participants or witnesses, shall, within 24 hours after completing the investigation, forward an electronic report of the accident to the Department of Administration. However, the law enforcement officer may submit a written report if the law enforcement agency employing the officer has received an exemption from the Department of Public Safety because the law enforcement agency does not have the technological capacity to submit reports of motor vehicle accidents electronically. The commissioner of public safety shall notify the Department of Administration of the exemption and the period for which the exemption was granted under this subsection.

An accident report is not required under this section from a person who is physically incapable of making the report during the period of incapacity.

The Department of Administration shall consider accident reports under this section to satisfy any requirements for reporting of motor vehicle crashes in the state.

History.

(am E.O. No. 99 §§ 57 — 59 (1997); §§ 50-5-5 f, g ACLA 1949; §§ 50-5-5 h, i, j ACLA 1949; added by § 3 ch 123 SLA 1959; added by § 3 ch 123 SLA 1959; am §§ 2, 3 ch 69 SLA 1960; am § 20 ch 144 SLA 1977; am §§ 25, 26 ch 6 FSSLA 1996; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 45 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For safety responsibility, see 2 AAC 90, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (b), inserted “or electronic” following “forward a written”; in (c), inserted “the department’s Internet website,” following “obtained from”, and made a stylistic change; in (e), near the end of the first sentence, substituted “an electronic report” for “a written report”, added the second and third sentences; added (g).

Sec. 28.35.090.
Rendering of report by others.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle is physically incapable of giving an immediate notice of an accident as required in AS

28.35.080

and there was another occupant in the vehicle at the time of the accident capable of doing so, the occupant shall make or give the notice not given by the driver.

Whenever the driver is physically incapable of making a written report of an accident as required in AS

28.35.080

and the driver is not the owner of the vehicle, then the owner of the vehicle involved in the accident shall within five days after learning of the accident make the report not made by the driver.

History.

(§ 50-5-5 j ACLA 1949; am § 3 ch 123 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.35.100.
Form of reports.

The Department of Public Safety shall prepare and upon request supply to police departments, coroners, local peace officers, garages, and other suitable agencies or individuals, forms for accident reports. The written reports by persons involved in accidents and by investigating officers shall require sufficiently detailed information to disclose the cause of the accident, conditions existing at the time of the accident, and the persons and vehicles involved.

Every accident report required to be made in writing shall be made on the appropriate form approved by the Department of Public Safety and must contain all of the information required unless not available.

History.

(§ 50-5-5 k ACLA 1949; added by § 3 ch 123 SLA 1959; am E.O. No. 99 § 60 (1997))

Sec. 28.35.110.
Penalty for giving false information in report or failing to report.

A person who gives information in reports as required in AS

28.35.080

knowing or having reason to believe that the information is false is punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by both.

The department shall suspend the license or permit to drive and the nonresident operating privileges of a person failing to report an accident as provided in AS

28.35.080

until the report is filed. The department may extend the suspension by not more than 30 days. A person failing to make a report as required in AS

28.35.080

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not more than $200, or by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, or by both.

History.

(§ 50-5-5 l, m ACLA 1949; added by § 3 ch 123 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.35.120.
Use of accident reports in evidence.

A report made in accordance with this chapter may not be used in evidence in a criminal or civil action arising out of the accident that is the subject of the report.

History.

(§ 4 ch 123 SLA 1959)

Sec. 28.35.130.
False report or destruction of evidence involving a vehicle.

An officer or person who knowingly makes or subscribes a false report concerning an investigation of a vehicle or damage or injury caused by a vehicle, as provided in this chapter, is guilty of unsworn falsification in the second degree. A person who destroys, obliterates, conceals, or removes, or who aids, abets, or assists in the destruction, obliteration, concealment, or removal from a vehicle, of evidence showing or tending to show that the vehicle collided with a person or property, is punishable by a fine of not more than $500, or by imprisonment for not more than six months, or by both.

History.

(§ 50-5-6 ACLA 1949; am § 8 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 18 ch 42 SLA 2006)